Alabama, session 2026rs, SB156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
39 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
40 the Gun Violence Protective Order Act.
41 Section 2. The Legislature finds and declares the
42 following:
43 (1) Over 100,000 people become victims of a gunshot
44 wound each year and more than 30,000 of those victims lose
45 their lives.
46 (2) Federal law prohibits any individual subject to
47 certain domestic violence restraining orders from purchasing
48 or possessing firearms. Many states have similar laws. About
49 half of the states also authorize or require a court that is
50 issuing a domestic violence protective order to require the
51 abuser to surrender firearms that he or she may already have
52 in his or her possession. This act is modeled on existing
53 domestic violence laws that have firearms surrender
54 provisions.
55 (3) Studies have shown that an individual who engages
56 in certain dangerous behaviors is significantly more likely to
Page 2

in certain dangerous behaviors is significantly more likely to
SB156 INTRODUCED
57 commit an act of violence toward himself or herself or others
58 in the near future. These behaviors, which might include other
59 acts or threats of violence, self-harm, or the abuse of drugs
60 or alcohol, serve as warning signs that the individual might
61 soon commit an act of violence.
62 (4) Under federal law, an individual suffering from
63 mental illness is not prohibited from purchasing or possessing
64 a firearm unless he or she has been involuntarily committed to
65 a mental institution, found not guilty of a crime by reason of
66 insanity, or undergone some other formalized court proceeding
67 regarding his or her mental illness. Similarly, an individual
68 who has committed a violent act toward another is not
69 prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law until
70 after he or she has been convicted of a felony or domestic
71 violence misdemeanor.
72 (5) It is the purpose and intent of the Legislature to
73 reduce firearm deaths and injuries by providing a formal court
74 procedure that law enforcement officers, teachers, and family
75 members may use to obtain a court order that prevents an
76 individual who poses a significant danger of causing personal
77 injury to self or others from gaining access to firearms and
78 ammunition. The Legislature intends for these court orders to
79 be limited to situations in which the individual poses a
80 significant danger of causing personal injury to self or
81 others by owning, purchasing, controlling, possessing, or
82 receiving a firearm or ammunition.
83 Section 3. The following terms have the following
84 meanings:
Page 3

meanings:
SB156 INTRODUCED
85 (1) EX PARTE GUN VIOLENCE PROTECTIVE ORDER. An order
86 issued by a court, pursuant to Section 5, that prohibits the
87 respondent from owning, purchasing, controlling, possessing,
88 or receiving firearms or ammunition until a court-scheduled
89 hearing for a one-year gun violence protective order.
90 (2) FAMILY MEMBER. An individual related by blood,
91 marriage, or adoption to the respondent, current or former
92 dating partner of the respondent, and any individual who
93 resides or has resided with the respondent or who is acting or
94 has acted as the respondent's legal guardian.
95 (3) FIREARM. A weapon from which a shot is discharged
96 by gun powder.
97 (4) ONE-YEAR GUN VIOLENCE PROTECTIVE ORDER. An order
98 issued by a court, pursuant to Section 6, prohibiting the
99 respondent from owning, purchasing, controlling, possessing,
100 or receiving guns or ammunition for a period of one year.
101 (5) PETITIONER. A law enforcement officer, teacher, or
102 family member of the respondent who files a petition pursuant
103 to Section 4.
104 (6) RESPONDENT. The individual identified in the
105 petition filed under Section 4, Section 5, or Section 6.
106 (7) TEACHER. A teacher, school administrator, school
107 counselor, college professor, student teacher, safety or
108 resource officer, or coach of the respondent.
109 Section 4. (a) A petitioner may seek a gun violence
110 protective order by filing a verified petition on a form
111 approved by the Administrative Office of Courts in the court
112 of the county where the respondent resides.
Page 4

of the county where the respondent resides.
SB156 INTRODUCED
113 (b) The petition shall set forth the grounds for the
114 issuance of the order and shall describe the number, types,
115 and locations of any firearms or ammunition presently believed
116 by the petitioner to be possessed or controlled by the
117 respondent. The petition shall also state whether there is an
118 existing domestic violence protective order in effect
119 governing the respondent and whether there is any pending
120 lawsuit, complaint, petition, or other action between the
121 parties under the laws of this state. The court administrator
122 shall verify the terms of any existing order governing the
123 parties. The court may not delay granting relief because of
124 the existence of a pending action between the parties or the
125 necessity of verifying the terms of an existing order. A
126 petition for a gun violence protective order may be granted
127 whether or not there is a pending action between the parties.
128 (c) If the respondent is alleged to pose an immediate
129 and present danger of causing personal injury to a family
130 member, or a family member is alleged to have been the target
131 of a threat or act of violence by the respondent, the
132 petitioner shall make a good faith effort to provide notice to
133 any and all adult family members of the respondent. The notice
134 must state that the petitioner intends to petition the court
135 for a gun violence protective order, and, if the petitioner is
136 a law enforcement officer, must also include a referral to
137 relevant domestic violence or stalking advocacy or counseling
138 resources, if appropriate. The petitioner shall attest to
139 having provided the notice in the verified petition. If the
140 petitioner is unable to provide notice to any or all adult
Page 5

petitioner is unable to provide notice to any or all adult
SB156 INTRODUCED
141 family members of the respondent, the verified petition shall
142 describe what good faith efforts were made.
143 (d) All health records and other health information
144 provided in a petition or considered as evidence in a
145 proceeding under this act shall be protected from public
146 disclosure to the extent the information identifies a
147 respondent or petitioner, except that the information may be
148 provided to law enforcement agencies as set forth in Section
149 10. Aggregate statistical data about the numbers of gun
150 violence protective orders issued, renewed, denied, dissolved,
151 or terminated shall be available to the public upon request.
152 (e) Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall set a
153 date for a hearing within 14 calendar days, regardless of
154 whether the court issues an ex parte gun violence protective
155 order. If the court issues an ex parte gun violence protective
156 order, notice of the hearing shall be served on the respondent
157 with the ex parte order. Notice of the hearing shall be
158 personally served on the respondent by a law enforcement
159 officer.
160 (f) The Administrative Office of Courts shall prescribe
161 the form of the petitions, orders, and any other documents and
162 shall adopt any rules of court necessary for the
163 implementation of this act.
164 Section 5. (a) A petitioner may request that an ex
165 parte order be issued prior to a hearing for a one-year gun
166 violence protective order, without notice to the respondent,
167 by including in the petition detailed allegations based on
168 personal knowledge that the respondent poses an immediate and
Page 6

personal knowledge that the respondent poses an immediate and
SB156 INTRODUCED
169 present danger of causing personal injury to self or others
170 through his or her ownership, purchase, control, possession,
171 or receipt of a firearm or ammunition.
172 (b) The court shall issue or deny an ex parte gun
173 violence protective order on the same day that the petition is
174 submitted to the court, unless the petition is filed too late
175 in the day to allow for its effective review, in which case
176 the order shall be issued or denied on the next business day.
177 (c) Before issuing an ex parte gun violence protective
178 order, the court shall examine under oath the petitioner and
179 any witnesses the petitioner may produce. The court may also
180 do the following:
181 (1) Ensure that a reasonable search has been conducted
182 of all available records to determine whether the respondent
183 owns any firearms or ammunition.
184 (2) Ensure that a reasonable search has been conducted
185 for criminal history records related to the respondent.
186 (d) In determining whether grounds for an ex parte gun
187 violence protective order exists, the court shall consider all
188 relevant evidence presented by the petitioner, and may also
189 consider other relevant evidence, including, but not limited
190 to, evidence of the occurrence of any of the following events
191 by the respondent:
192 (1) Unlawful, reckless, or negligent use, display,
193 storage, possession, or brandishing of a firearm.
194 (2) Act or threat of violence against self or another,
195 whether or not the violence involved a firearm.
196 (3) Violation of a protective order issued under
Page 7

(3) Violation of a protective order issued under
SB156 INTRODUCED
197 Chapter 5 or Chapter 5B of Title 30 of the Code of Alabama
198 1975, or a similar law in another state.
199 (4) Abuse of controlled substances or alcohol or any
200 criminal offense that involves controlled substances or
201 alcohol.
202 (5) The recent acquisition of firearms, ammunition, or
203 other deadly weapons.
204 (e) The court shall also consider the time that has
205 elapsed since the occurrence of any event described in
206 subsection (d).
207 (f) If a court finds reasonable cause to believe that
208 the respondent poses an immediate and present danger of
209 causing personal injury to self or others by owning,
210 purchasing, controlling, possessing, or receiving a firearm or
211 ammunition, the court shall issue an ex parte gun violence
212 protective order.
213 (g) An ex parte gun violence protective order shall
214 include all of the following:
215 (1) A statement that the respondent may not own,
216 purchase, control, possess, or receive, or attempt to purchase
217 or receive, a firearm or ammunition while the order is in
218 effect.
219 (2) A description of the requirements for
220 relinquishment of firearms and ammunition under Section 8.
221 (3) A statement of the grounds asserted for the order.
222 (4) A notice of the hearing under Section 4(e) to
223 determine whether to issue a one-year gun violence protective
224 order, including the address of the court and the date and
Page 8

order, including the address of the court and the date and
SB156 INTRODUCED
225 time for when the hearing is scheduled.
226 (5) A statement that the court may extend the order by
227 one year at the hearing.
228 (6) A statement that the respondent may seek the advice
229 of an attorney as to any matter connected with the order, and
230 that the attorney should be consulted promptly so that the
231 attorney may assist the individual in any matter connected
232 with the order.
233 (h) An ex parte gun violence protective order shall be
234 personally served on the respondent by a law enforcement
235 officer.
236 (i) In accordance with Section 4(e), the court shall
237 schedule a hearing within 14 calendar days of the issuance of
238 an ex parte gun violence protective order to determine if a
239 one-year gun violence protective order shall be issued. A
240 respondent may seek an extension of time before the hearing.
241 The court shall dissolve any ex parte gun violence protective
242 order in effect against the respondent when the court holds
243 the hearing.
244 Section 6. (a) A petitioner requesting a one-year gun
245 violence protective order shall include in the petition
246 detailed allegations based on personal knowledge that the
247 respondent poses a substantial danger of causing personal
248 injury to self or others through his or her ownership,
249 purchase, control, possession, or receipt of a firearm or
250 ammunition.
251 (b) Prior to a hearing for a one-year gun violence
252 protective order, the court shall do both of the following:
Page 9

protective order, the court shall do both of the following:
SB156 INTRODUCED
253 (1) Ensure that a reasonable search has been conducted
254 of all available records to determine whether the respondent
255 owns any firearms or ammunition.
256 (2) Ensure that a reasonable search has been conducted
257 for criminal history records related to the respondent.
258 (c) In determining whether to issue a one-year gun
259 violence protective order under this section, the court shall
260 consider all relevant evidence presented by the petitioner and
261 may also consider other relevant evidence, including, but not
262 limited to, evidence of events identified in Section 5(d).
263 (d) If the court finds by a preponderance of the
264 evidence at the hearing that the respondent poses a
265 substantial danger of personal injury to self or others
266 through his or her ownership, purchase, control, possession,
267 or receipt of a firearm or ammunition, the court shall issue a
268 one-year gun violence protective order.
269 (e) A one-year gun violence protective order issued
270 under this section shall include all of the following:
271 (1) A statement that the respondent may not own,
272 possess, control, purchase, or receive, or attempt to purchase
273 or receive, a firearm or ammunition while the order is in
274 effect.
275 (2) A description of the requirements for
276 relinquishment of firearms and ammunition under Section 8.
277 (3) A statement of the grounds supporting the issuance
278 of the order.
279 (4) The date and time the order expires.
280 (5) The address of the court that issued the order.
Page 10

(5) The address of the court that issued the order.
SB156 INTRODUCED
281 (6) A statement that the respondent shall have the
282 right to request one hearing to terminate the order at any
283 time during its effective period.
284 (7) A statement that the respondent may seek the advice
285 of an attorney as to any matter connected with the order.
286 (f) If the respondent fails to appear at the hearing
287 and the court determines that a one-year gun violence
288 protective order shall be issued, the order shall be
289 personally served on the respondent by a law enforcement
290 officer.
291 Section 7. (a) A respondent subject to a one-year gun
292 violence protective order may submit one written request at
293 any time during the effective period of the order for a
294 hearing to terminate the order.
295 (1) Upon receipt of the request for termination, the
296 court shall set a date for a hearing. Notice of the request
297 shall be served on the petitioner in accordance with the
298 Alabama Rules of Civil Procedure. The hearing shall occur no
299 sooner than 14 calendar days from the date of service of the
300 request upon the petitioner.
301 (2) The respondent seeking termination of the order
302 shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the
303 evidence that the respondent does not pose a substantial
304 danger of causing personal injury to self or others through
305 his or her ownership, purchase, control, possession, or
306 receipt of a firearm or ammunition.
307 (3) If the court finds that the respondent has met his
308 or her burden, the court shall terminate the order.
Page 11

or her burden, the court shall terminate the order.
SB156 INTRODUCED
309 (b) A petitioner may request a renewal of a one-year
310 gun violence protective order at any time within the three
311 months before the expiration of the order.
312 (1) A court, after notice and a hearing, may renew the
313 one-year gun violence protective order if the court, by a
314 preponderance of the evidence, finds that the respondent
315 continues to pose a substantial danger of causing personal
316 injury to self or another through his or her ownership,
317 purchase, control, possession, or receipt of a firearm or
318 ammunition.
319 (2) In determining whether to renew a one-year gun
320 violence protective order, the court shall consider all
321 relevant evidence presented by the petitioner, and may also
322 consider other relevant evidence, including, but not limited
323 to, evidence of the events identified in Section 5(d).
324 (3) A one-year gun violence protective order renewed
325 under this subsection shall expire after one year, subject to
326 termination by further order of the court at a hearing held
327 under subsection (a) and further renewal by order of the court
328 under this subsection.
329 Section 8. (a) Upon issuance of an ex parte or one-year
330 gun violence protective order, the court shall order the
331 respondent to surrender to the local law enforcement agency
332 all firearms and ammunition of which the respondent has
333 custody, control, or ownership.
334 (b) A law enforcement officer serving a gun violence
335 protective order shall request that all firearms and
336 ammunition belonging to or in the custody or control of the
Page 12

ammunition belonging to or in the custody or control of the
SB156 INTRODUCED
337 respondent be immediately surrendered and shall take
338 possession of the firearms and ammunition that are
339 surrendered. A law enforcement officer serving a gun violence
340 protective order may conduct a lawful search for firearms and
341 ammunition.
342 (c) At the time of surrender or removal, a law
343 enforcement officer taking possession of a firearm or
344 ammunition pursuant to a gun violence protective order shall
345 issue a receipt identifying all firearms and ammunition that
346 have been surrendered or removed and provide a copy of the
347 receipt to the respondent. Within 72 hours after serving the
348 order, the officer who served the order shall file the
349 original receipt with the court that issued the gun violence
350 protective order, and shall ensure that the law enforcement
351 agency retains a copy of the receipt.
352 (d) If a petitioner has probable cause to believe a
353 respondent to a gun violence protective order owns, controls,
354 or possesses a firearm or ammunition that the respondent has
355 failed to surrender pursuant to this section, or has received
356 or purchased a firearm or ammunition while subject to the
357 order, the petitioner may petition the court to issue a
358 warrant. The petition shall describe the firearm or ammunition
359 and where the firearm or ammunition is reasonably believed to
360 be located. The court may issue the warrant upon a finding of
361 probable cause.
362 (e) A law enforcement agency may charge the respondent
363 a fee not to exceed the reasonable and actual costs incurred
364 by the law enforcement agency for storing a firearm or
Page 13

by the law enforcement agency for storing a firearm or
SB156 INTRODUCED
365 ammunition surrendered pursuant to this section for the
366 duration of the gun violence protective order and any
367 additional periods necessary under Section 7.
368 Section 9. (a) As used in this section, "dispose" means
369 to sell or transfer a firearm or ammunition to a federally
370 licensed dealer, defined under 18 U.S.C. § 921 et seq., or to
371 destroy the firearm or ammunition.
372 (b) Thirty days before a one-year gun violence
373 protective order is set to expire, a law enforcement agency
374 holding a firearm or ammunition that has been surrendered
375 pursuant to the order shall notify the petitioner that the
376 order is set to expire. The notice shall advise the petitioner
377 of the procedures for seeking a renewal of the order pursuant
378 to Section 7.
379 (c) If a gun violence protective order is terminated or
380 expires and is not renewed, a law enforcement agency holding
381 any firearm or ammunition that has been surrendered pursuant
382 to Section 8 shall notify the respondent that he or she may
383 request the return of the firearm or ammunition. The law
384 enforcement agency shall return any surrendered firearms or
385 ammunition requested by a respondent only after confirming,
386 through a background check, that the respondent is currently
387 eligible to own or possess firearms and ammunition.
388 (d) A respondent who has surrendered a firearm or
389 ammunition to a law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 8
390 and who does not wish to have the firearm or ammunition
391 returned or who is no longer eligible to own or possess a
392 firearm or ammunition may sell or transfer title of the
Page 14

firearm or ammunition may sell or transfer title of the
SB156 INTRODUCED
393 firearm or ammunition to a licensed firearms dealer. The law
394 enforcement agency shall transfer possession of the firearm or
395 ammunition to a licensed firearms dealer only after the dealer
396 has displayed written proof of transfer of the firearm or
397 ammunition from the respondent to the dealer and the law
398 enforcement agency has verified the transfer.
399 (e) If an individual other than the respondent claims
400 title to a firearm or ammunition surrendered pursuant to
401 Section 8, and the individual is determined by the law
402 enforcement agency to be the lawful owner of the firearm or
403 ammunition, the gun or ammunition shall be returned to him or
404 her.
405 (f) A law enforcement agency holding a firearm or
406 ammunition that was surrendered by a respondent pursuant to
407 Section 8 may dispose of the firearm or ammunition only after
408 six months from the date of proper notice to the respondent of
409 the intent to dispose of the firearm or ammunition, unless the
410 firearm or ammunition has been claimed by the lawful owner. If
411 the firearm or ammunition remains unclaimed after six months
412 from the date of notice, then no party shall have the right to
413 assert ownership of the firearm or ammunition and the law
414 enforcement agency may dispose of the firearm or ammunition.
415 Section 10. (a) The court shall notify the Alabama
416 State Law Enforcement Agency (ALEA) no later than one business
417 day after issuing, renewing, dissolving, or terminating an ex
418 parte or one-year gun violence protective order under this
419 act.
420 (b) The information required to be submitted to ALEA
Page 15

(b) The information required to be submitted to ALEA
SB156 INTRODUCED
421 pursuant to this section shall include identifying information
422 about the respondent and the date the order was issued,
423 renewed, dissolved, or terminated. In the case of a one-year
424 order, the court shall include the date the order is set to
425 expire. The court shall also indicate whether the respondent
426 to the one-year gun violence protective order was present in
427 court to be advised of the contents of the order or if the
428 respondent failed to appear. The respondent's presence in
429 court shall constitute proof of service of notice of the terms
430 of the order.
431 (c) Within one business day of service, a law
432 enforcement officer who serves a gun violence protective order
433 or the clerk of the court shall submit the proof of service
434 and a copy of the protection order to ALEA for entry into the
435 appropriate database.
436 (d) The information to be submitted to ALEA under this
437 section shall be submitted in an electronic format, in a
438 manner prescribed by ALEA. ALEA shall maintain a searchable
439 database of this information, available to law enforcement
440 agencies upon request.
441 (e) Within 30 days of submission of the information
442 under subsection (d), ALEA shall make information about an ex
443 parte or one-year gun violence protective order issued,
444 renewed, or terminated pursuant to this act available to the
445 National Instant Criminal Background Check System for the
446 purposes of firearm purchaser background checks.
447 Section 11. (a) A person who files a petition for a gun
448 violence protective order, knowing the information in the
Page 16

violence protective order, knowing the information in the
SB156 INTRODUCED
449 petition to be materially false or with an intent to harass
450 the respondent, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
451 (b) A person who owns, purchases, controls, possesses,
452 or receives a firearm or ammunition with knowledge that he or
453 she is prohibited from doing so by a gun violence protective
454 order is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor and shall be
455 prohibited from owning, purchasing, controlling, possessing,
456 or receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm
457 or ammunition for a period of five years from the date of
458 conviction.
459 Section 12. This act shall not affect the ability of a
460 law enforcement officer to remove firearms or ammunition from
461 any individual pursuant to other lawful authority.
462 Section 13. This act shall not be construed to impose
463 criminal or civil liability on any individual who chooses not
464 to seek a gun violence protective order pursuant to this act.
465 Section 14. This act shall become effective on October
466 1, 2026.
Page 17